Illinois, session 104th, SB3245.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5adding Section 9.21 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/9.21 new)7    Sec. 9.21. Air pollution setbacks. The Agency shall 8propose and the Board shall adopt rules to ensure mandatory 9minimum distances are maintained between sources of air 10pollution and homes, schools, hospitals, and other similar 11sites in all applicable Clean Air Act permits to protect the 12public health, except as prohibited by federal law.